Utah statutes.
73-3-25.   Well driller's license -- Enforcement.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Well" means an open or cased excavation or borehole for diverting,
using, or monitoring underground water made by any construction method.
(b)  "Well driller" means a person with a license to engage in well drilling
for compensation or otherwise.
(c)  "Well drilling" means the act of:
(i)  drilling, constructing, repairing, renovating, deepening, cleaning,
developing, or abandoning a well; or
(ii)  installing or repairing a pump in a well.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), a person who installs or repairs a
pump in a well on the person's own property for the person's own use is not
required to obtain a license under this section.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), a person who installs or repairs
a pump in a well for compensation:
(i)  shall obtain a license as required by Subsection (3); and
(ii)  is subject to all of this section's provisions.
(c)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(b), a person who
performs electrical repairs on a pump in a well is not required to obtain a
license as required by Subsection (3).
(3) (a) (i)  A person shall obtain a license as provided in this section
before engaging in well drilling.
(ii)  The state engineer may enforce Subsection (3)(a)(i) in accordance with
Sections 73-2-25 and 73-2-26.
(b)  A person applying for a well driller license shall file a well driller
bond:
(i)  with the state engineer; and
(ii)  payable to the Division of Water Rights.
(c) (i)  Compliance with this section and the rules authorized by this section
is required to obtain or renew a well driller license.
(ii)  The state engineer may refuse to issue a license if it appears an
applicant violates a rule authorized by this section.
(d)  A well driller license is not transferable.
(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the state engineer may make rules establishing:
(a)  the amount, form, and general administrative requirements of a well
driller bond;
(b)  the amount of a well driller fine;
(c)  minimum well drilling standards;
(d)  well driller reporting requirements;
(e)  the requirements for obtaining a well driller license, including:
(i)  a well driller license application form;
(ii)  the license expiration date; and
(iii)  the license renewal cycle; and
(f)  a procedure to enforce a well drilling standard or other well drilling
requirement.
(5) (a)  A well driller shall submit a report to the state engineer:
(i)  containing data relating to each well;
(ii)  within 30 days after the completion or abandonment of the well drilling;
(iii)  on forms furnished by the state engineer; and
(iv)  containing information required by the state engineer.
(b)  In accordance with Sections 73-2-25 and 73-2-26, the state engineer may
commence an enforcement action against a person who fails to submit a report
required by Subsection (5)(a) within 90 days of the day on which the well
driller license lapses.
(6) (a)  A well driller shall comply with the rules authorized by this
section.
(b)  If the state engineer determines that a well driller has failed to comply
with a rule, the state engineer may, in accordance with the procedures
established in rule:
(i) (A)  order that a well driller pay a fine; or
(B)  revoke or suspend the well driller's license; and
(ii)  exact the bond.
(7) (a)  The state engineer shall retain the money from a fine or exacting a
bond as a dedicated credit.
(b)  The state engineer may expend:
(i)  money retained from a fine for:
(A)  well drilling inspection;
(B)  well drilling enforcement; or
(C)  well driller education; and
(ii)  money retained from exacting a bond to investigate or correct a
deficiency by a well driller that could adversely affect the public interest
resulting from noncompliance with a rule authorized by this section.
